Illinois, session 104th, HB1705.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 1. This Act may be referred to as Alyssa's Law. 5    Section 5. The School Code is amended by adding Sections 62-3.206, 10-20.88, and 34-18.88 as follows: 7    (105 ILCS 5/2-3.206 new)8    Sec. 2-3.206. Mobile panic alert system solicitation. Not 9later than December 1, 2025, the State Board of Education 10shall conduct market research, in consultation with the 11Illinois Emergency Management Agency, to identify whether an 12existing competitively procured source of supply is available 13for a system that satisfies the requirements of subsection (a) 14of Section 10-20.88 and subsection (a) of Section 34-18.88 15from multiple vendors for use by school districts. If no 16existing source of supply exists, then the State Board shall 17issue a competitive solicitation for such source of supply no 18later than January 1, 2026. 19    (105 ILCS 5/10-20.88 new)20    Sec. 10-20.88. Mobile panic alert system.21    (a) Not later than July 1, 2026, each school board shall   HB1705- 2 -LRB104 07537 LNS 17581 b1implement a mobile panic alert system capable of connecting 2disparate emergency services technologies to ensure real-time 3coordination between local and State law enforcement and first 4responder agencies. This system shall be known as "Alyssa's 5Alert" and shall integrate with local, public-safety, 6answering-point infrastructure to transmit 9-1-1 calls and 7mobile activations.8    (b) In addition to the requirements of subsection (a), 9each school board may implement additional strategies or 10systems to ensure real-time coordination between multiple 11first responder agencies in the event of a school security 12emergency.13    (c) A school board is not required to procure or implement 14new or additional capabilities if, as of July 1, 2025, the 15school board has already implemented a mobile panic alert 16system with capabilities that meet the requirements of 17subsection (a).  18    (105 ILCS 5/34-18.88 new)19    Sec. 34-18.88. Mobile panic alert system.20    (a) Not later than July 1, 2026, the board shall implement 21a mobile panic alert system capable of connecting disparate 22emergency services technologies to ensure real-time 23coordination between local and State law enforcement and first 24responder agencies. This system shall be known as "Alyssa's 25Alert" and shall integrate with local, public-safety,   HB1705- 3 -LRB104 07537 LNS 17581 b1answering-point infrastructure to transmit 9-1-1 calls and 2mobile activations.3    (b) In addition to the requirements of subsection (a), the 4board may implement additional strategies or systems to ensure 5real-time coordination between multiple first responder 6agencies in the event of a school security emergency.7    (c) The board is not required to procure or implement new 8or additional capabilities if, as of July 1, 2025, the board 9has already implemented a mobile panic alert system with 10capabilities that meet the requirements of subsection (a).  11    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 12becoming law.